en: Multigrain sliced breads, Sliced breads with cereals, Multigrain sandwich loaf
de: Geschnittenes Mehrkornbrot
es: Panes de molde con cereales
fi: viipaloidut siemenleivät
fr: Pains de mie aux céréales, Pain de mie aux céréales, Pain de mie multicéréales, Pains de mie aux graines et céréales, pain de mie aux graines
hr: Višezrnati rezani kruh
it: Pane ai cereali a fette
lt: Daugiagrūdės duonos, pjaustytos duonos su grūdais, Daugiagrūdės sumuštinių duonos
nl: Gesneden Meergranenbroden
pt: Pães de forma multicereais
sv: Skivade flerkornsbröd

en: Wholemeal sliced breads, Wholemeal English bread, Wholemeal sandwich loaf
bg: Пълнозърнест нарязан хляб
da: Skiveskårne fuldkornsbrød
de: Vollkorntoast
es: Panes de molde integrales
fr: Pains de mie complet, Pain de mie complet
hr: Integralni rezani kruhovi
lt: Pilno grūdo pjaustytos duonos
nl: Gesneden volkorenbroden
pt: Pães de forma integral
sv: Skivade fullkornsbröd

en: Sourdough sliced breads
da: Skiveskårne surdejsbrød
sv: Skivade surdegsbröd

en: Brioche sandwich bread
fr: Pains de mie briochés

en: Bran sliced breads, Bran grain sandwich loaf
fr: Pain de mie au son

en: Sliced Danish style rye breads
da: Skiveskårne rugbrød, Rugbrød i skiver
sv: Skivade rågbröd

en: Gluten-free sliced breads
da: Skiveskårne glutenfrie brød
de: Glutenfreies geschnittenes Brot
es: Panes de molde sin gluten
fr: Pains de mie sans gluten
hr: Bezglutenski rezani kruh
it: Pancarré senza glutine
lt: Pjaustytos duonos be glitimo, Pjaustyta duona be glitimo
nl: Glutenvrije gesneden broden
pl: Chleb krojony bezglutenowy
sv: Skivade glutenfria bröd

en: Toasts
bg: Тостове
da: Toastbrød
de: Toastbrote, Toastbrot
es: Pan tostado, Tostadas
fi: paahtoleivät
fr: Pains grillés, Pain grillé
hr: Zdravice
it: Toast
ja: トースト
lt: Skrudintos duonos
nl: Toasts, Toast
pt: Tostas
zh: 吐司面包

en: Toasted bread rolls
de: Toastbrötchen
es: Panecillos tostados
fi: paahdetut sämpylät
fr: Petits pains grillés
hr: Tostirane peciva
nl: Zweedse toasts, Zweedse toast
pl: Chleb tostowy, Chleby tostowe

en: Sliced rusk with eggs
fr: Pain grillé brioché

en: Wheat swedish toast
fr: Pain grillé suédois au froment

en: Swedish toast with linseeds
fr: Pain grillé suédois aux graines de lin

en: Wheat wholemeal Swedish toast
fr: Pain grillé suédois au blé complet

en: Swedish toast with fruits
fr: Pain grillé suédois aux fruits

en: Home-made toasted breads
fr: Pain grillé fait-maison

en: Wheat rusk slices
fr: Pain grillé en tranches au froment, petits pains grillés au froment

en: Multigrain rusk slice
fr: Pain grillé en tranches multicéréale

en: Unleavened breads, Azymes, Matzah
de: Ungesäuertes Brot, Azyma, Matzen
es: Panes ácimos, Pan ácimo
fi: happamattomat leivät
fr: Pains azymes, pain azyme
hr: Beskvasni kruhovi
it: Pani azzimi, pane azzimo
nl: Matzekrekkers, Matzes

en: White breads
bg: Бял хляб
de: Weißbrote, Weißbrot
es: Panes blancos, Pan blanco
fi: vaaleat leivät
fr: Pains blancs, Pain blanc
he: לחמים לבנים
hr: Bijeli kruhovi
it: Pane bianco
ja: 白パン
lt: Baltos duonos, Balta duona
nl: Witte broden, Witbrood
pt: Pães brancos
ro: Pâini albe, Pâine albă
ru: Белый хлеб, Хлеб белый
tr: Beyaz ekmek

en: Bread white from wheat flour of the highest grade GOST 26987-86
fr: Pain blanc à base de farine de blé de la plus haute qualité GOST 26987-86
hr: Bijeli kruh od pšeničnog brašna najvišeg stupnja gost 26987-86
it: Pane bianco di farina di grano del grado GOST maggiore 26987-86
ru: Хлеб белый из пшеничной муки высшего сорта ГОСТ 26987-86